California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) The goal of the program shall be to favorably resolve a statistically significant number of disputes sent to mediation under the program. This section shall not apply to any dispute that turns on a question of major insurance coverage or a purely legal interpretation, or any dispute involving the actions of an agent or broker in which the insurer is not alleged to have been responsible for the conduct, or any complaint the commissioner finds to be frivolous, or any dispute in which a party is alleged to have committed fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 447, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.71.

Any insured having a dispute with an insurer under a policy that qualifies for this program may file a written complaint with the department. The complaint shall indicate that the complainant has not been able to reach a satisfactory settlement of a claim with the insurer. The department shall, if deemed appropriate, notify the insurer against whom the complaint is made of the nature of the complaint, may request appropriate relief for the complainant, and may meet and confer with the complainant and the insurer in order to attempt resolution of the dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 357, Sec. 3.   Effective August 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.72.

(a) If, after the department’s intervention, the insurer and the insured do not reach agreement, the department may notify the insurer that in order to avoid referral to mediation, the insurer shall have 28 calendar days to resolve the dispute, unless the department, for good cause, extends the period by an additional 7 calendar days.

(b) The department may not refer a claim or dispute to mediation unless the amount claimed by the insured exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) and the amount in dispute exceeds two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 357, Sec. 4.   Effective August 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.73.

If the dispute is not resolved within the time period prescribed by Section 10089.72, the insurer shall notify the department of the failure, and may include the reason for the failure. The insurer shall, within the time period prescribed by Section 10089.72, notify the department of its position if it believes that the dispute is not eligible for the mediation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 727, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.74.

(a) If the insurer notifies the department of the failure to resolve the dispute, the department shall notify the insured of the insured’s ability to request mediation and ask the insured whether the insured requests mediation. If the insured responds affirmatively, the department shall refer the dispute to mediation.

(b) If the insurer fails to give the required notice to the department prior to the expiration of the time limits set forth in Section 10089.72, the department shall notify the insured of the insured’s ability to request mediation and ask the insured whether the insured requests mediation. If the insured responds affirmatively, the department shall refer the dispute to mediation. The department may not refer a dispute to mediation if the matter turns upon any of the reasons or conditions set forth in Section 10089.70, relative to applicability, or if for other good cause the commissioner determines that mediation of the dispute is inappropriate.

(c) If the insured has filed a civil complaint, the insurer is excused from mediating under this chapter any claims or disputes involved in the civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 727, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.75.

(a) Any insurer may inform an insured who has filed a complaint with the department concerning a dispute that qualifies for this program of the existence of the mediation program and may ask the insured to seek mediation under this chapter jointly with the insurer. Any insurer may notify the department of any dispute arising out of a qualifying event that it believes may be appropriately resolved through the mediation program. The department, with respect to that notification, shall proceed as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 10089.74.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10089.82, if the commissioner makes a finding that an individual insurer has engaged in unreasonable or arbitrary refusals to mediate, the commissioner shall have the authority to require that insurer to participate in mediation in all cases deemed by the commissioner appropriate for mediation under this chapter.

(c) Any insurer who has been ordered to participate in mediation on a mandatory basis may seek a review of the order by filing in a court of competent jurisdiction within 30 calendar days of the order. The commissioner’s order to participate in mediation, however, may not be stayed during the pendency of any judicial proceeding for any period beyond 60 calendar days after the initial date of the order to participate. The basis for the commissioner’s decision to require an insurer to participate in the mediation program shall not be made public unless review is sought. The commissioner’s decision not to require an insurer to participate, including the basis for the decision, shall be made public.

(d) Any insured whose request to mediate his or her claim under this chapter was declined by an insurer may request the commissioner to require the insurer to participate in the mediation program and may seek review in a court of competent jurisdiction of the commissioner’s decision not to require the insurer to participate in the mediation program. The review shall be required to be sought within 30 calendar days after the commissioner’s decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 727, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.76.

Upon referral of a complaint to mediation, the department shall immediately transfer all necessary information concerning the claim, including the name and address of the insured and the insurer, to a mediator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   Effective October 13, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.77.

The department shall contract with a diverse pool of mediators for the provision of mediation services. The contractors shall be qualified mediators who meet standards established by the commissioner. The commissioner shall establish standards in consultation with consumer groups, policyholder groups, mediators, alternative dispute resolution groups, insurers, and the State Bar. These standards shall include:

(a) Mandatory training that may be provided by the department, which shall include, at a minimum, the legal rules for insurance policy interpretation and the rights of insureds under California law, and methods of determining costs of construction and reconstruction and costs of automobile repair in given geographical areas.

(b) A requirement that no mediator participating in this program may have business, familial, contractual, or other affiliation with, or financial interest in, the insured, or in any insurer, insurance agent, or agency. For purposes of this subdivision, an investment in a mutual fund that holds insurer stocks is not a financial interest. Financial interest does not include prior representation of, or an employment or contractual relationship with a law firm or lawyer who represents, one or more insurers or who represents insurance agents in connection with their business affairs, provided the law firm or lawyer has not previously represented any of the parties to the mediation.

However, any prior representation, employment, or contractual relationship shall be disclosed to the parties to the mediation. If any party objects to the mediator because of the prior representation, employment, or contractual relationship, the department shall dismiss that mediator and select a new mediator. An objection under this subdivision does not limit a party’s right to object once under subdivision (d).

(c) A requirement that no mediator participating in this program may be either a lawyer or an employee of a lawyer or law firm that has represented any party to the mediation in the previous 36 months, or a person who has a business, familial, contractual, or other affiliation with a lawyer or law firm that has represented any party to the mediation in a lawsuit against the insurer in the last 36 months.

(d) Each party to the mediation may object once to the mediator assigned by the department. If a party objects to the mediator, the department shall dismiss the mediator and assign another mediator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 727, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.78.

Upon receipt of a complaint, the mediation service, to the extent possible, shall issue a notice to the insured and the insurer setting a date and time within 21 calendar days of the date of the notice for commencement of a mediation conference. The mediator shall make all reasonable efforts to schedule the mediation at a time agreeable to both parties. The notice shall inform the parties that the cost of mediation will be borne by the insurer, except to the extent provided in Section 10089.81. The notice shall also state that in the event of a proposed settlement the insured may have three business days in which to rescind the agreement, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 10089.82.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 727, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.79.

(a) The costs of mediation shall be reasonable, and shall be borne by the insurer, except as provided in Section 10089.81. The commissioner may set a fee not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for each homeowners’ or earthquake coverage dispute mediated pursuant to this chapter, and seven hundred dollars ($700) for each automobile coverage dispute mediated pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The administrative expenses for the mediation program shall be paid from existing resources available to the department. If additional resources are required by the department, those resources shall be made available by an annual appropriation in the Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 447, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.80.

(a) The representatives of the insurer shall know the facts of the case and be familiar with the allegations of the complainant. The insurer or the insurer’s representative shall produce at the settlement conference a copy of the policy and all documents from the claims file relevant to the degree of loss, value of the claim, and the fact or extent of damage. For disputes mediated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10089.70, the department shall refer to mediation issues related to the settlement of the claim. The insured and insurer shall produce, to the extent available, documents relevant to the successful mediation of the claim, including documents related to the degree of loss, the value of the claim, and the fact or extent of damage.

The mediator may also order production of other documents that the mediator determines to be relevant to the issues under mediation. If a party declines to comply with that order, the mediator may appeal to the commissioner for a determination of whether the documents requested should be produced. The commissioner shall make a determination within 21 days. However, the party ordered to produce the documents shall not be required to produce while the issue is before the commissioner in this 21-day period. If the ruling is in favor of production, any insurer that is subject to an order to participate in mediation issued under subdivision (a) of Section 10089.75 shall comply with the order to produce. Insureds, and those insurers that are not subject to an order to participate in mediation, shall produce the documents or decline to participate further in the mediation after a ruling by the commissioner requiring the production of those other documents. Declination of mediation by the insurer under this section may be considered by the commissioner in exercising authority under subdivision (a) of Section 10089.75.

The mediator shall have the authority to protect from disclosure information that the mediator determines to be privileged, including, but not limited to, information protected by the attorney-client or work-product privileges, or to be otherwise confidential.

(b) The mediator shall determine prior to the mediation conference whether the insured will be represented by counsel at the mediation. The mediator shall inform the insurer whether the insured will be represented by counsel at the mediation conference. If the insured is represented by counsel at the mediation conference, the insurer’s counsel may be present. If the insured is not represented by counsel at the mediation conference, then no counsel may be present.

(c) Section 703.5 and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9 of the Evidence Code apply to a mediation conducted under this chapter.

(d) The statements made by the parties, negotiations between the parties, and documents produced at the mediation are confidential. However, this confidentiality shall not restrict the access of the department to documents or other information the department seeks in order to evaluate the mediation program or to comply with reporting requirements. This subdivision does not affect the discoverability or admissibility of documents that are otherwise discoverable or admissible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 447, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.81.

All parties to the mediation proceeding shall negotiate in good faith and shall have the authority to immediately settle claims. An insurer that fails to appear for a scheduled mediation conference or meeting for which the consumer appears shall pay the consumer for his or her actual expenses incurred in attending the conference plus the value of lost wages. An insured who has good cause for a failure to appear may reschedule one time, at a time set by the mediator. If an insured fails to demonstrate good cause for the first failure to appear or subsequent failures to appear, that insured loses his or her right to mediate the claim under this chapter and shall pay all costs charged by the mediator up to the time of the failure to appear that terminates the mediation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   Effective October 13, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.82.

(a) An insured may not be required to use the department’s mediation process. An insurer may not be required to use the department’s mediation process, except as provided in Section 10089.75.

(b) Neither the insurer nor the insured is required to accept an agreement proposed during the mediation.

(c) If the parties agree to a settlement agreement, the insured will have three business days to rescind the agreement. Notwithstanding Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9 of the Evidence Code, if the insured rescinds the agreement, it may not be admitted in evidence or disclosed unless the insured and all other parties to the agreement expressly agree to its disclosure. If the agreement is not rescinded by the insured, it is binding on the insured and the insurer, and acts as a release of all specific claims for damages known at the time of the mediation presented and agreed upon in the mediation conference. If counsel for the insured is present at the mediation conference and a settlement is agreed upon that is signed by the insured’s counsel, the agreement is immediately binding on the insured and may not be rescinded.

(d) This section does not affect rights under existing law for claims for damage that were undetected at the time of the settlement conference.

(e) All settlements reached as a result of department-referred mediation shall address only those issues raised for the purpose of resolution. Settlements and any accompanying releases are not effective to settle or resolve any claim or dispute not addressed by the mediator for the purpose of resolution, nor any claim that the insured may have related to the insurer’s conduct in handling the claim. However, for mediations conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10089.70, the insurer and insured may agree to a complete settlement and release of all disputes related to the claim, including any claim the insured may have related to the insurer’s conduct in handling the claim, provided the legal effect of the release is disclosed and fully explained to the claimant by the mediator.

Referral to mediation or the pendency of a mediation under this article is not a basis to prevent or stay the filing of civil litigation arising in whole or in part out of the same facts. Any applicable statute of limitations or limitation on the insured’s right to sue as set forth in Section 2071 is tolled for the number of days beginning from the notification date to the insurer pursuant to Section 10089.72, until the date on which the mediation is either completed or declined, or the date on which the insured fails to appear for a scheduled mediation for the second time, or, in the event that a settlement is completed, the expiration of any applicable three-business-day cooling off period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10089.83.

(a) On or before August 1 of each year in which this program is in effect, the commissioner shall report to the Governor, the Legislature, and to the committees of the Senate and Assembly having jurisdiction over insurance on the status of the program in the prior year, including statistics about the number of cases suitable for mediation, the number sent to mediation, and the number accepted, as well as declined, by the insurers, and other similar information concerning the operation of the program in the annual report submitted pursuant to Section 12922.

(b) At six-month intervals, the department shall collect from the mediators with which it contracts for this service the following information: the number of persons to whom mediation was offered, the number of insurers that accepted and declined mediation, the number of settlements, and of those settlements, the number rejected within the three business day cooling off period. For each settlement, the mediation service shall also report the amount initially claimed by the consumer and the amount agreed to be paid, if any, by the insurer or other party.

(c) The department may adopt regulations, including reporting requirements, in the commissioner’s discretion, to implement this chapter. The regulations shall be adopted as emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of the regulations is deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health or safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 405, Sec. 8.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 14 of Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Basic Property Insurance Inspection and Placement Plan [10090. - 10100.3.]

10090.

The purposes of this chapter are to do all of the following:

(a) To assure stability in the property insurance market for property located in the State of California.

(b) To assure the availability of basic property insurance as defined by this chapter.

(c) To encourage maximum use, in obtaining basic property insurance, of the normal insurance market provided by admitted insurers and licensed surplus line brokers.

(d) To provide for the equitable distribution among admitted insurers of the responsibility for insuring qualified property for which basic property insurance cannot be obtained through the normal insurance market by the establishment of a FAIR Plan (fair access to insurance requirements), an industry placement facility and a joint reinsurance association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 649.)
-------------------------------------------

10091.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Association,” “industry placement facility,” or “facility,” means a joint reinsurance association, the California FAIR Plan Association, formed by insurers licensed to write and engaged in writing basic property insurance within this state to assist persons in securing basic property insurance and to formulate and administer a program for the equitable apportionment among insurers of basic property insurance.

(b) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of this state.

(c) (1) “Basic property insurance” means insurance against direct loss to real or tangible personal property at a fixed location in those geographic or urban areas, as designated by the commissioner, from perils insured under the standard fire policy and extended coverage endorsement, from vandalism and malicious mischief, and includes other insurance coverages as may be added with respect to that property by the industry placement facility with the approval of the commissioner or by the commissioner. “Basic property insurance” includes insurance for manufactured homes and mobilehomes under the same terms and conditions as basic property insurance sold for
 other residential dwellings. “Basic property insurance” does not include insurance on automobile risks, commercial agricultural commodities or livestock, or equipment used to cultivate or transport agricultural commodities or livestock.

(2) For the purposes of earthquake coverage that is provided as a component of basic property insurance, the association shall sell only the policy described in Section 10089. In force policies of basic property insurance that include earthquake coverage shall be renewed with the coverage specified in Section 10089, and the association shall comply with the notice requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10086.

(d) “Inspection bureau” means the organization or organizations designated by the
 association with the approval of the commissioner to make inspections to determine the condition of the properties for which basic property insurance is sought and to perform other duties as may be authorized by the association.

(e) “Premiums written” means gross direct premiums charged with respect to property in this state on all policies of basic property insurance and the basic property insurance premium components of all multiperil policies, less return premiums, dividends paid or credited to policyholders, or the unused or unabsorbed portions of premium deposits.

(f) “Insurer” means a person who undertakes to indemnify another against loss, damage, or liability arising from a contingent or unknown event, and shall include reciprocals and interinsurance exchanges.

(g) “Manufactured home” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Mobilehome” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.   (SB 525)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10092.

This chapter shall not apply to county mutual fire insurers nor to fraternal fire insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10093.

(a) Any person having an insurable interest in real or tangible personal property who, after diligent effort, has been unable to obtain basic property insurance through normal channels from an admitted insurer or a licensed surplus line broker, shall be entitled upon application to the facility to an inspection of the property by representatives of the inspection bureau. Such inability to obtain such insurance after diligent effort through normal channels may, in the discretion of the association, be demonstrated by a signed general statement to that effect on a form prescribed by the association.

(b) The manner and scope of the inspection and the form of the inspection report shall be prescribed by the facility with the approval of the commissioner. The inspection shall include, but need not be limited to, pertinent structural and occupancy features as well as the general condition of the building and surrounding structures. A representative photograph of the property may be taken as part of the inspection.

(c) Promptly after the request for inspection is received, an inspection shall be made and an inspection report filed with the company or companies designated by the facility. A copy of the completed inspection report shall be sent to the facility and to the applicant upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

10094.

(a) Within 30 days after the effective date of this chapter, with the approval of the commissioner, all insurers licensed to write and engaged in writing in this state, on a direct basis, basic property insurance or any component of basic property insurance in multiperil policies, shall establish an industry placement facility, the California FAIR Plan Association, to formulate and administer a program for the equitable apportionment among insurers of basic property insurance that may be afforded to persons having an interest in real or tangible personal property who, after diligent effort, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 10093, are unable to procure insurance through normal channels from an admitted insurer or a surplus line broker. Each insurer, as a condition of its authority to transact those kinds of insurance in
 this state, shall participate in an industry placement facility program in accordance with rules to be established by a governing committee, composed of nine insurers annually elected in the manner to be provided in the program. The governing committee shall also have as nonvoting members one representative of insurance agents, one representative of insurance brokers, one representative of surplus line brokers, and one representative of the public, each to be appointed by the Governor. The Speaker of the Assembly and the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Rules shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio members of the governing committee, and each may name a designee to serve in their place.

(b) The governing committee may establish separate classifications of written premiums for the purpose of equitable distribution, but shall not include
 premiums from automobile risks, commercial agricultural commodities or livestock, or equipment used to cultivate or transport agricultural commodities or livestock.

(c) The program may provide, with the approval of the commissioner, for assessment of all members in amounts sufficient to operate the facility, and may establish maximum limits of liability to be placed through the program, reasonable underwriting standards for determining insurability of a risk, and commission to be paid to the licensed producer designated by the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 474, Sec. 1.   (AB 234)   Effective October 9, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10094.2.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 10095, the facility shall, pursuant to regulations adopted by the commissioner, provide for a method whereby insurers who voluntarily write basic property insurance on risks located in areas designated at the beginning of the policy period as brush hazard areas by the Insurance Services Office (ISO) or designated at the beginning of the policy period as high or very high fire hazard severity zones as determined and mapped by the Department of
 Forestry and Fire Protection, or very high fire hazard severity zones as determined and mapped by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code will, to that extent, be proportionately relieved of the liability to participate in a plan adopted pursuant to this chapter. The facility shall, pursuant to regulations adopted by the commissioner, provide for a method whereby insurers who voluntarily write basic property insurance or business owners package insurance on risks located in areas designated as inner-city areas by the commissioner will, to that extent, be proportionately relieved of the liability to participate in a plan adopted pursuant to this chapter.
 This chapter does not preclude adoption of a plan or plans to allow proportionate credit for voluntary writings in other areas or for other classes of insurance.

(b) (1) The facility shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor, the commissioner, and the committees of the Senate and the Assembly having jurisdiction over insurance, identifying the credit for voluntary writings submitted by licensees in the high and very high fire hazard severity zones as determined and mapped by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, and the very high fire hazard severity zones as determined and mapped by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, in order to determine whether or not the designations are sufficient to effectuate the purposes of this
 section.

(2) The facility shall prepare and submit the report required by this subdivision three times, with the first report due on or before July 1, 2023, the second report due on or before July 1, 2025, and the third report due on or before July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   (AB 1816)   Effective October 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10094.5.

Within 90 days following the effective date of this section, the association shall file a new or amended rate application with the commissioner consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10091.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 128, Sec. 3.   (SB 11)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10095.

(a) Within 30 days following the effective date of this chapter, the association shall submit to the commissioner, for the commissioner’s review, a proposed plan of operation, consistent with this chapter, creating an association consisting of all insurers licensed to write and engaged in writing in this state, on a direct basis, basic property insurance or any component of basic property insurance in homeowners or other dwelling multiperil policies. An insurer described in this subdivision shall be a member of the association and shall remain a member as a condition of its authority to transact those kinds of insurance in this state.

(b) The proposed plan shall authorize the association to
 assume and cede reinsurance on risks written by insurers in conformity with the program.

(c) Under the plan, an insurer shall participate in the writings, expenses, profits, and losses of the association in the proportion that its premiums written during the second preceding calendar year bear to the aggregate premiums written by all insurers in the program, excluding that portion of the premiums written attributable to the operation of the association. Premiums written on a policy of basic residential earthquake insurance issued by the California Earthquake Authority pursuant to Section 10089.6 shall be attributed to the insurer that writes the underlying policy of residential property insurance.

(d) The plan shall provide for administration by a governing committee
 under rules to be adopted by the governing committee with the approval of the commissioner. Voting on administrative questions of the association and facility shall be weighted in accordance with each insurer’s premiums written during the second preceding calendar year as disclosed in the reports filed by the insurer with the commissioner.

(e) The plan shall provide for a plan to encourage persons to secure basic property insurance through normal channels from an admitted insurer or a licensed surplus line broker by informing those persons what steps they must take in order to secure the insurance through normal channels.

(f) The plan shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner and shall go into effect upon the tentative approval of the commissioner. The commissioner
 may, at any time, withdraw tentative approval or the commissioner may, at any time after giving final approval, revoke that approval if the commissioner feels it is necessary to carry out the purposes of the chapter. The withdrawal or revocation of that approval shall not affect the validity of any policies executed before the date of the withdrawal. If the commissioner disapproves or withdraws or revokes their approval to all or any part of the plan of operation, the association shall, within 30 days, submit for review an appropriately revised plan or part of a revised plan, and, if the association fails to do so, or if the revised plan is unacceptable, the commissioner shall promulgate a plan of operation or part of a plan as the commissioner may deem necessary to carry out this chapter.

(g) The association may, on its own initiative or at
 the request of the commissioner, amend the plan of operation, subject to approval by the commissioner, who shall have supervision of the inspection bureau, the facility, and the association. The commissioner, or any person designated by the commissioner, shall have the power of visitation of and examination into the operation and free access to all the books, records, files, papers, and documents that relate to operation of the facility and association, and may summon, qualify, and examine as witnesses all persons having knowledge of those operations, including officers, agents, or employees thereof.

(h) An insurer member of the plan shall provide to an applicant who is denied coverage, or a policyholder whose policy is canceled or not renewed, the internet website address and statewide toll-free telephone number for the plan
 established pursuant to Section 10095.5 for the purpose of obtaining information and assistance in obtaining basic property insurance.

(i) To reduce the association’s concentration and number of policies, and to encourage maximum use of the normal insurance market consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 10090, the association shall develop and implement a clearinghouse program on or before July 1, 2021, to help reduce the number of existing FAIR Plan policies and provide the opportunity for admitted insurers to offer homeowners’ insurance policies to FAIR Plan policyholders. An insurer that participates in the clearinghouse program shall sign an agreement with the association that sets forth the terms and conditions for the insurer to offer homeowners insurance through the policy’s listed agent or broker of record, if any. The
 clearinghouse program may include a provision to include nonadmitted insurers if admitted insurers have the first option.

(j) To reduce the association’s concentration and number of commercial policies, and to encourage maximum use of the normal insurance market consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 10090, the association shall develop and implement a commercial insurance policy clearinghouse program on or before July 1, 2024, to help reduce the number of existing FAIR Plan commercial policies and provide the opportunity for admitted insurers to offer commercial insurance policies to FAIR Plan policyholders. An insurer that participates in the commercial policy clearinghouse program shall sign an agreement with the association that sets forth the terms and conditions for the insurer to offer commercial insurance through the policy’s listed agent or
 broker of record, if any. The commercial policy clearinghouse program may include a provision to include nonadmitted insurers if admitted insurers have the first option.

(k) (1) With respect to the clearinghouse programs referenced in subdivisions (i) and (j), the association shall comply with the Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act (Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1) and regulations on the Privacy of Nonpublic Personal Information (Subchapter 5.9 (commencing with Section 2689.1) of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations).

(2) The association shall provide all policyholders with notice of each of the following: 

(A) The manner in which the association shall share policyholders’ personal information to facilitate
 offers of private insurance through the clearinghouse programs.

(B) A method to opt out of the sharing of policyholders’ personal information in connection with the clearinghouse programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 180, Sec. 1.   (SB 505)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10095.5.

(a) The association shall establish and maintain an Internet Web site and a statewide toll-free telephone number through which a person may receive information and assistance in applying for insurance through the plan. The association shall cause the toll-free telephone number to be published in all general distribution telephone directories in the state and shall include the toll-free telephone number and Internet Web site address on all communications with an applicant or insured.

(b) An insurance agent or broker transacting basic property insurance shall assist a person seeking his or her help in obtaining basic property insurance coverage by any one of the following methods:

(1) Making an application for insurance through the plan by submitting an application at the person’s request.

(2) Providing the person with the California FAIR Plan’s Internet Web site address and the toll-free telephone number.

(3) Making an application for insurance, at the person’s request, and placing that person with or through an insurer that offers, or a surplus line broker that procures, basic property insurance coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 543, Sec. 3.   (SB 1302)   Effective September 23, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10095.7.

(a) The commissioner shall establish the California Home Insurance Finder on the department’s Internet Web site. The purpose of the finder is to connect homeowners in need of insurance assistance to an insurance agent or broker to assist in finding residential property insurance.

(1) The department shall annually survey licensed insurance agents, licensed insurance brokers, and admitted insurers in California regarding inclusion on the finder.

(2) On or before July 1, 2020, and at least annually thereafter, the department shall update the finder with the names, addresses, phone numbers, and Internet
 Web site links, if the licensee has an Internet Web site address, of the licensed insurance agents and brokers and admitted insurers for inclusion in the finder. The information shall be aggregated by ZIP Code within which the insurance agent, broker, or insurer maintains an office or sells policies, as well as by the languages in which the insurance agent, broker, or insurer may transact insurance.

(3) The department shall use social media and other appropriate tools to make consumers aware of the California Home Insurance Finder. The department shall develop materials in the most common languages used in the state to facilitate access to the finder for non-English-speaking consumers.
